District of Columbia statutes.
47-461

Council findings.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

Many District residents and businesses are already overburdened by current taxation levels.

(2)

The health of the District’s tax base and its potential for economic growth require the maintenance of a competitive tax burden between the District and neighboring jurisdictions.

(3)

Present tax policies and laws are in need of evaluation with respect to their equitability, productivity, efficiency, and effect on economic growth;

(4)

New or broadened revenue sources must be explored as possible substitutes for current uncompetitive rates to meet the District’s revenue needs, but they must be evaluated carefully in terms of their equity and their effect on economic growth.

(5)

The last comprehensive study of District taxes occurred in 1998, and more recent tax changes have been somewhat piecemeal and sometimes made without regard to the system as a whole or knowledge of long-term effects.

History

June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-143, § 2, 43 DCR 2170
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 7062(a), 58 DCR 6226

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-461.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-21, in par. (5), substituted “in 1998” for “in 1977”.

Short Title

Short title: Section 7061 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle G of title VII of the act may be cited as “Tax Revision Commission Reestablishment Act of 2011”.